Wisconsin, session 2025, AB910.
do enact as follows:AB910,11Section 1. 16.42 (5) of the statutes is created to read:AB910,2,2216.42 (5) (a) In this subsection:AB910,2,631. “Base year” means the year immediately preceding the year in which a fine 4or fee was first imposed or, if the amount of the fine or fee increased or decreased 5after being first imposed, the year immediately preceding the year in which the 6amount of the fine or fee was last adjusted.AB910,3,272. “Consumer price index” means the average of the consumer price index 1over each 12-month period, all items, U.S. city average, as determined by the 2bureau of labor statistics of the U.S. department of labor.AB910,3,433. “Fee” means any fee, charge, or surcharge that an agency is authorized or 4required by law to impose on any person.AB910,3,654. “Fine” means any fine or forfeiture that an agency is authorized or required 6by law to impose on any person.AB910,3,117(b) Beginning in 2026, and every 3rd fiscal biennium thereafter, each agency 8required to submit a budget request under sub. (1) shall include with its request, 9and shall submit to the governor and to the legislature under s. 13.172 (2), a report 10on the form prescribed by the department under par. (e) that includes all of the 11following:AB910,3,16121. An identification of each fine and each fee assessed by the agency, the 13amount of the fine or fee, when the amount of the fine or fee was last adjusted, the 14act authorizing the agency to assess the fine or fee, including a description of the 15act and the date of enactment, and whether the specific amount of the fine or fee is 16established by statute.AB910,3,21172. A calculation of the amount of each fine or each fee identified under subd. 1. 18if the fine or fee were increased by the percentage difference between the consumer 19price index for the 12-month period ending on December 31 of the preceding year 20and the consumer price index for the base year, rounded up to the nearest dollar, or, 21at the discretion of the agency, the nearest 25 cents.AB910,4,3223. Except for a fine or fee specified in par. (c), a recommendation with respect 23to adjusting each fine and each fee to reflect the inflation-adjusted amount as 24calculated in subd. 2., or a recommendation to take no action to adjust the amount 1of the fine or fee. For each fee charged in connection with services provided by the 2agency, the recommendation shall take into account the agency’s cost to provide 3those services relative to the inflation-adjusted amount as calculated in subd. 2.AB910,4,544. An identification of the amount the agency is authorized to expend each 5fiscal year from the revenues of each fine or fee.AB910,4,1065. A plan to implement the agency’s recommendation under subd. 3. The plan 7may include a graduated increase in the amount of the fine or fee over a period of no 8more than 4 years. In developing the implementation plan, the agency shall take 9into account the financial impact of an increase in the fine or fee on the persons 10assessed the fine or fee.AB910,4,1911(c) At the time each agency submits a report under par. (b), the agency shall 12submit a separate report to the governor on the form prescribed by the department 13under par. (e) that identifies each fine or fee for which the amount is not specified by 14statute and the agency has the authority to set or adjust the dollar amount and that 15includes a recommendation with respect to adjusting the fine or fee to reflect the 16inflation-adjusted amount as calculated in par. (b) 2. For a fee charged in 17connection with services provided by the agency, the recommendation shall take 18into account the agency’s cost to provide those services relative to the inflation-19adjusted amount as calculated in (b) 2.AB910,4,2320(d) 1. No later than the 60th day after the effective date of this paragraph .... 21[LRB inserts date], and no later than January 31 every 6 years thereafter, the 22legislative fiscal bureau shall publish a table showing the annual consumer price 23index for the preceding 50 years.AB910,5,212. At an agency’s request, the legislative fiscal bureau shall assist the agency 2in calculating the inflation-adjusted amount of a fine or fee under par. (b) 2.AB910,5,43(e) The department shall prescribe standard forms for the reports required 4under pars. (b) and (c).AB910,5,55